Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2104
Prohibited acts; penalty.

A person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony if he or she willfully and maliciously:

(1) Damages, injures, or destroys or attempts to damage, injure, or destroy:

(a) Any machine, appliance, facility, or apparatus owned by a public power supplier that is used for generating electricity; or

(b) Any facility or electric wire owned by a public power supplier that is used for the purpose of conducting, transforming, transmitting, or distributing electricity or any pole, bracket, insulator, or other appliance or apparatus owned by a public power supplier that supports or carries any electric wire owned by a public power supplier; or

(2) Does any act for the purpose of interrupting the generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity by a public power supplier.

Laws 2009, LB238, § 6.
May 27, 2009